Utah statutes.
61-2-25.   Sales agents -- Affiliated with broker as independent contractors
or employees -- Presumption.
A sales agent may be affiliated with a licensed principal real estate broker
either as an independent contractor or as an employee.  The relationship
between sales agent and broker is presumed to be an independent contractor
relationship unless there is clear and convincing evidence that the
relationship was intended by the parties to be an employer employee
relationship.
